Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-12,189
Matching funds; payment; carry forward permitted, when.

If the applicant cannot be paid in full in any given fiscal year, then the matching funds shall be paid in later years until fully funded. If, based upon total investment expended, the applicant is not entitled to receive the maximum of fifty million dollars in matching funds in any given year, the balance of matching funds shall be carried forward and available for distribution in future years as provided in section 81-12,185.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 105;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 190.